Washington statutes.
RCW 35.70.090

Lien of assessments and foreclosure.

The assessments shall become a lien upon the respective parcels of land and shall be collected in the manner provided by law for the collection of local improvement assessments and shall bear interest at the rate of six percent per annum from the date of the approval of said assessment thereon.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.70.090. Prior: 1915 c 149 s 6, part; RRS s 9160, part.]

NOTES:

Collection and foreclosure of local improvement assessments: Chapters 35.49, 35.50 RCW.